New York, session 2025-2026, S4584.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "survivors first act". 3 § 2. Section 623 of the executive law is amended by adding a new 4 subdivision 18-a to read as follows: 5 18-a. To publicize through the office, state, county, and municipal 6 criminal justice agencies, statewide coalitions, victim service provid- 7 ers, survivor support agencies, hospitals, medical, mental health or 8 other counseling service providers, local programs for crime victims, 9 and other public or private agencies, the existence of the programs 10 funded by the office, including the procedures for obtaining compen- 11 sation from the office as defined in section six hundred twenty-five-a 12 of this article. 13 § 3. Subdivision 20 of section 623 of the executive law, as amended by 14 chapter 489 of the laws of 2014, is amended to read as follows: 15 20. To render [each year] annually to the governor [and], to the 16 legislature, and to the public via the office's website, on or before 17 December first of each year, a written report on the office's activities 18 including, but not limited to, specific information on each of the 19 subdivisions of this section. [Such] 20 (a) The annual report shall also include but not be limited to infor- 21 mation regarding crime victim service programs, including: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08947-09-6 S. 4584--A 2 1 [(1)] (i) the programs funded by the office; 2 [(2)] (ii) other sources of funding for crime victims service 3 programs; 4 [(3)] (iii) an assessment of the adequacy of the current level of 5 appropriation to the office to meet the reasonable needs of crime 6 victims service programs for funding under section six hundred thirty- 7 one-a of this article; and 8 [(4)] (iv) an estimate of the reasonable needs of programs in the next 9 fiscal year. 10 (b) The annual report shall also include but not be limited to infor- 11 mation regarding the office's performance measures, including: 12 (i) the number of claim applications filed with the office; 13 (ii) the number of claims accepted, including disaggregated data 14 denoting the claims accepted by type, for eligibility determinations; 15 (iii) the number of claims rejected, including disaggregated data 16 denoting the categorical reasons for claims rejected; 17 (iv) the number of claims resulting in no award decisions, including 18 disaggregated data denoting the categorical reasons for no award deci- 19 sions; 20 (v) the number of claims awarded, including disaggregated data denot- 21 ing the claim type for claims awarded; 22 (vi) anonymized data denoting the race, gender, age, sexual orien- 23 tation, and county of residence for claim applications filed, claims 24 accepted, claims rejected, claims resulting in no award decisions, and 25 claims awarded; 26 (vii) anonymized data denoting the crime involved in claim applica- 27 tions filed, claims accepted, claims rejected, claims resulting in no 28 award decisions, and claims awarded; and 29 (viii) the average time between the office receiving an application, 30 the determination of eligibility, and the first award to the victim. 31 (c) After December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-five, pursuant to 32 paragraph (a) of subdivision one of section six hundred thirty-one, the 33 annual report shall also include but not be limited to information 34 regarding the records indicating the commission of a crime, including: 35 (i) the number of claims using the records of a support agency for 36 survivors of crime, including disaggregated data denoting the categori- 37 cal type of support agency for survivors of crime; and 38 (ii) the number of claims using the records of a criminal justice 39 agency, including disaggregated data denoting the categorical type of 40 criminal justice agency. 41 (d) The annual report shall also include but not be limited to infor- 42 mation regarding the office's performance of the duty of publicization 43 pursuant to subdivision eighteen-a of this section. 44 § 4. Subdivisions 1 and 1-a of section 625-a of the executive law, 45 subdivision 1 as amended by section 15 of part A-1 of chapter 56 of the 46 laws of 2010, and subdivision 1-a as added by chapter 416 of the laws of 47 1979, are amended to read as follows: 48 1. [Every] The office shall supply informative booklets, pamphlets and 49 other pertinent written information, including information cards, to 50 every police station, precinct house, support agency for survivors of 51 crime as defined in paragraph (c) of subdivision one of section six 52 hundred thirty-one of this article after December thirty-first, two 53 thousand twenty-five, any appropriate location where a crime may be 54 reported and any location required by the rules and regulations of the 55 office [shall have available informative booklets, pamphlets and other 56 pertinent written information, including information cards, to be S. 4584--A 3 1 supplied by the office], relating to the availability of crime victims 2 compensation including all necessary application blanks required to be 3 filed with the office [and shall display prominently], and to supply 4 posters giving notification of the existence and general provisions of 5 this article, those provisions of the penal law that prohibit the intim- 6 idation of crime victims and the location of the nearest crime victim 7 service program. The office [may issue] shall promulgate rules and regu- 8 lations for the effective implementation of such outreach plan, which 9 shall include guidelines for the [location of such] prominent display 10 [and shall provide] of such notification posters[, application forms, 11 information cards and general information]. Every [victim who reports a 12 crime in any manner whatsoever] appropriate location where a crime may 13 be reported shall be [given] included in the outreach plan, which shall 14 provide such appropriate locations with instructions regarding notice 15 about the rights of crime victims and the existence of all relevant 16 local victim's assistance programs and services pursuant to section six 17 hundred twenty-five-b of this article, and [supplied by the person 18 receiving the report with information,] the distribution of application 19 blanks[,] and information cards which shall clearly state: (a) that 20 crime victims may be eligible for state compensation benefits; (b) the 21 address and phone number of the office; (c) that police and district 22 attorneys can help protect victims against harassment and intimidation; 23 (d) the addresses and phone numbers of local victim service programs, 24 where appropriate, or space for inserting that information; or (e) any 25 other information the office deems appropriate. Such cards shall be 26 printed and distributed by the office and shall be designed by the 27 office in consultation with local police[, and shall be printed and 28 distributed by the office]. The office shall develop a system for 29 distributing a sufficient supply of the information cards referred to in 30 this subdivision, to all the appropriate designated locations, which 31 shall include a schedule for meeting that requirement. 32 1-a. [Every] The office shall supply posters giving notification of 33 the existence and general provisions of this article, application 34 blanks, and general information to every general hospital established 35 under the laws of this state[, which] that maintains facilities for 36 providing out-patient emergency medical care, and each such hospital 37 shall display the posters prominently in its emergency room [posters 38 giving notification of the existence and general provisions of this 39 chapter]. The [board may issue guidelines] office shall promulgate 40 rules and regulations for the [location of such display and shall 41 provide posters, application forms and general information regarding the 42 provision of] effective implementation of this [chapter to each such 43 hospital] subdivision. 44 § 5. Subdivisions 4 and 5 of section 631 of the executive law, subdi- 45 vision 4 as amended by section 22 of part A-1 of chapter 56 of the laws 46 of 2010 and subdivision 5 as amended by section 2 of part G of chapter 47 55 of the laws of 2025, are amended to read as follows: 48 4. (a) Any award made pursuant to this article shall be reduced by the 49 amount of any payments received or to be received by the claimant as a 50 result of the injury from federal or federally financed state and local 51 programs. 52 (b) Any award made pursuant to this article [shall] may be reduced by 53 the amount of any payments received or to be received by the claimant as 54 a result of the injury [(a)] (i) from or on behalf of the person who 55 committed the crime, [(b)] (ii) under insurance programs mandated by 56 law, [(c)] (iii) from public funds, [(d)] (iv) under any contract of S. 4584--A 4 1 insurance wherein the claimant is the insured or beneficiary, [(e)] (v) 2 as an emergency award pursuant to section six hundred thirty of this 3 article. 4 (c) Notwithstanding the [foregoing] provisions of paragraphs (a) and 5 (b) of this subdivision, where the person injured is a livery operator 6 victim, because undue hardship may result to the claimant if immediate 7 payment is not made, any award pursuant to paragraphs (f) and (g) of 8 subdivision one of section six hundred twenty-seven of this article 9 shall be granted without reduction for workers' compensation benefits to 10 be received, if any. 11 (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraphs (a) and (b) of this 12 subdivision, any award made pursuant to this article shall not be 13 reduced by the amount of any payments received or to be received by the 14 claimant as a result of private donations, including but not limited to 15 funds raised through crowdfunding platforms. 16 5. (a) [Except as provided in paragraph (g) of this subdivision, in 17 determining the amount of an award, the office shall determine whether, 18 because of such victim's conduct, the victim of such crime contributed 19 to the infliction of such victim's injury, and the office shall reduce 20 the amount of the award or reject the claim altogether, in accordance 21 with such determination. 22 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 23 sion, the office shall disregard for this purpose the responsibility of 24 the victim for such victim's own injury where the record shows that the 25 person injured was acting as a good samaritan, as defined in this arti- 26 cle. 27 (c)] Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this article, where 28 the person injured acted as a good samaritan, the office may, without 29 regard to the financial difficulty of the claimant, make an award for 30 out-of-pocket losses. Such award may also include compensation for any 31 loss of property up to five thousand dollars suffered by the victim 32 during the course of such victim's actions as a good samaritan. 33 [(d)] (b) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this article, 34 where a person acted as a good samaritan, and was killed as a direct 35 result of the crime, the office may, without regard to the financial 36 difficulty of the claimant, make a lump sum award to such claimant for 37 actual loss of support not to exceed thirty thousand dollars. 38 [(e)] (c) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of this article, 39 where a police officer or firefighter, both paid and volunteer, dies 40 from injuries received in the line of duty as a direct result of a 41 crime, the office may, without regard to the financial difficulty of the 42 claimant, make an award for the unreimbursed counseling expenses of the 43 eligible spouse, domestic partner, parents, siblings or children of such 44 victim, and/or the reasonable burial expenses incurred by the claimant. 45 [(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 46 sion, the office shall disregard for this purpose the responsibility of 47 the victim for such victim's own loss of savings. 48 (g) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 49 sion, when determining a claim made by a person eligible under paragraph 50 (b), (c) or (d) of subdivision one of section six hundred twenty-four of 51 this article, if the crime upon which the claim is based resulted in the 52 death of the victim, the office shall not consider whether, because of 53 their conduct, the victim of such crime contributed to their death.] 54 § 6. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 55 it shall have become a law.